Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2006
Administration; appropriation by the Legislature; expenditures; certification by department.

Such money as may be appropriated by the Legislature for the administration of the State Hospital Survey and Construction Act shall be expended upon proper certification by the department as provided by law.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 6, p. 736;

Laws 1965, c. 421, § 4, p. 1351;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 510.